src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ################################################## !
!This file contains the morphology for the  Pronouns !
! ################################################## !


! Pronoun
! =======



! Personal pronouns
! -----------------


LEXICON MUNLEX
+Sg1: firstperspronsg ;
+Du1: firstpersprondu ;
+Pl1: perspronpl ;

LEXICON DONLEX
+Sg2: nonfirstperspronsg ;
+Du2: nonfirstpersprondu ;
+Pl2: perspronpl ;

LEXICON SONLEX
+Sg3: nonfirstperspronsg ;
+Du3: nonfirstpersprondu ;
+Pl3: perspronpl ;


!Case suffixes for 1st Sg, pointing to K lexicon
LEXICON firstperspronsg
+Nom:u%>n K ;
+Nom+Use/NG:o%>n K ; !
+Acc:u K ;
+Gen:u K ;
!+Gen+Use/-Spell:u# NAMAT ;
+Ill:u%>nnje K ;
+Loc:u%>s K ;
+Com:u%>jnna K ;
+Ess:u%>nin K ;

!Case suffixes for non-1st Sg, pointing to K lexicon
LEXICON nonfirstperspronsg
+Nom:o%>n K ;
+Acc:u K ;
+Gen:u K ;
!+Gen+Use/-Spell:u# NAMAT ;
+Ill:u%>tnje K ;
+Ill+Err/Orth:u%>nnje K ;
+Loc:u%>s K ;
+Com:u%>jnna K ;
+Ess:u%>nin K ;

!Case suffixes for 1st Du, pointing to K lexicon
LEXICON firstpersprondu
+Nom:oaj K ;
+Acc:unno K ;
+Gen:unno K ;
+Acc+Err/Orth:udno K ;
+Gen+Err/Orth:udno K ;
!+Gen+Use/-Spell:unno# NAMAT ;
+Ill:unnu%>jde K ;
+Loc:unno%>s K ;
+Com:unnu%>jn K ;
+Ess:unno%>n K ;

!Case suffixes for non-1st Du, pointing to K lexicon
LEXICON nonfirstpersprondu
+Nom:oaj K ;
+Acc:udno K ;
+Gen:udno K ;
+Acc+Err/Orth:utno K ; !
+Gen+Err/Orth:utno K ; !
!+Gen+Use/-Spell:udno# NAMAT ;
+Ill:udnu%>jde K ;
+Ill+Err/Orth:utnu%>jde K ; !
+Loc:udno%>s K ;
+Loc+Err/Orth:utno%>s K ; !
+Com:udnu%>jn K ;
+Com+Err/Orth:utnu%>jn K ; !
+Ess:udno%>n K ;
+Ess+Err/Orth:utno%>n K ; !

!Case suffixes for all Pl forms, pointing to K lexicon
LEXICON perspronpl
+Nom:i%>j K ;
+Acc:i%>n K ;
+Gen:i%>n K ;
!+Gen+Use/-Spell:i%>n# NAMAT ;
+Ill+Err/Orth:i%>nsij K ; !
+Ill:i%>djijde K ;
+Ill+Err/Orth:i%>ddjijde K ;
+Ill+Err/Orth:i%>nsiidda K ;
+Loc:i%>s K ;
+Loc+South+Err/Orth:i%>js K ; ! !SOUTH
+Com:i%>ngujn K ;
+Com+Err/Orth:ii%>gujn K ;
+Ess:i%>nin K ;

!LEXICON datpers
!+Sg3:0 perscassg ;
!+Pl3:0 perscaspl ;
!+Ess:nin K ;




! Interrogative and relative pronouns
! -----------------------------------

LEXICON MIIINTERLEX
+Sg+Nom:mij # ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:májd9  #  ; ! not both maid and máid
+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:májd9  #  ; !
+Sg+Acc:majd9 K-son ; ! So: suggesting maid, not máid, as default
+Pl+Nom:ma%>t # ;
+Ess:ma%>nin # ;
+Sg+Gen:ma%>n # ;
+Sg+Acc+Known:ma%>n # ;
+Sg+Ill:ma%>sa # ;
+Sg+Loc:ma%>s # ;
+Sg+Com:ma%>jnna # ; !
+Pl+Gen:ma%>jd9 # ;
+Pl+Acc:ma%>jd9 # ;
+Pl+Ill:ma%>jdda # ;
+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:ma%>jdde # ;
+Pl+Loc:ma%>jn # ;
+Pl+Com:ma%>jguin # ;



LEXICON GIIINTERLEX
+Sg+Nom:gij  K-son  ;
+Sg+Ill+Foc/Neg-ge:gea%>sagii # ; ! Now both Interr and Rel. ok?
:gea%>X5 oblintercas ;

LEXICON GUHTELEX
:guhºte GUHTECASE ;
+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:guhte%>s  #  ;

LEXICON GUHTEMUSLEX
:guđemužž GUHTEMUŠCASE ;
+Sg+Nom:guhtemuš  #  ; !deviating Nom alternant.



LEXICON oblintercas_indef
!+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:jd9 K-son ; ! XXX check this, tt Lene: det er umulig å skille mellom Sg og Pl i disambigueringa, og det er vel heller PL, skulle jeg tro: feara maid, vaikko maid, juogamaid
+Pl+Nom:t # ;
+Ess:nin # ;
+Sg:0 oblrelcassg ;
+Pl:0 oblrelcaspl ;


LEXICON oblintercas
+Pl+Nom:t K-son ;
+Ess:nin # ;
+Sg:0 oblrelcassg ;
+Pl:0 oblrelcaspl ;


LEXICON oblrelcassg  ! no clitics
+Gen:n K-son ;
+Acc:n K-son ;
+Ill:sa K-son ;
+Loc:s K-son ;
+Com:jnna K-son ; !dáinna Sg Com

LEXICON oblrelcaspl    ! no clitics
+Gen:jd9 K-son ;
+Acc:jd9 K-son ;
+Ill:jdda K-son ;
+Ill+Err/Orth:jdde K-son ;
+Loc:jn K-son ;
+Com:jguin K-son ;



! guhte
LEXICON GUHTECASE
GUHTE-NE ;
GUHTE-OBL ;

! Nom and Ess of guhte
LEXICON GUHTE-NE
+Sg+Nom: K-son ;
+Ess:%>n K-son ;

! guhtemuš
LEXICON GUHTEMUŠCASE
GUHTEMUŠ-NE ;
:a GUHTEMUŠ-OBL ;

! Nom and Ess of guhtemuš
LEXICON GUHTEMUŠ-NE
+Sg+Nom: K-son ;
+Ess:a%>n K-son ;

LEXICON GUHTE-OBL
+Sg+Gen:%>X8 K-son ;
+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X8 K-son ;
+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X8 K-son ;
!+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>X8# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Acc:%>X8 K-son ;
+Sg+Ill:%>X3j K-son ;
!+Sg+Gen: K-son ; ! this should go out
+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K-son ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n K-son ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:%>X5jn K-son ;
+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn K-son ;
+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K-son ;
+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9 K-son ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd9 K-son ;
!+Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>X5jd9# NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9 K-son ;
+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde K-son ;
+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn K-son ;


LEXICON GUHTEMUŠ-OBL
+Sg+Gen:%>X8 K-son ;
!+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>X8# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Acc:%>X8 K-son ;
+Sg+Ill:%>X3j K-son ;
!+Sg+Gen: K-son ; ! this should go out
+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K-son ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n K-son ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:%>X5jn K-son ;
+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn K-son ;
+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K-son ;
+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9 K-son ;
!+Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>X5jd9# NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9 K-son ;
+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde K-son ;
+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn K-son ;

! Demonstrative pronouns
! ----------------------




!Splitting into Sg, Pl and Ess, different paradigms
LEXICON demcas
+Sg:0 demcassg ;
+Pl:0 demcaspl ;
+Ess:%>nin K ;

!Splitting into Sg, Pl and Ess, different paradigms
!LEXICON datdemcas  - fjerna dat som Pers
!+Sg:0 datdemcassg ;
!+Pl:0 demcaspl ;
!+Ess:%>nin K ;

!LEXICON datdemcassg  - fjerna dat som Pers
!nomdemcassg ;
!obldatdemcassg ;


!Splitting into oblique and nonoblique
!This is because of the interrogatives
LEXICON demcassg
nomdemcassg ;
obldemcassg ;

LEXICON demcaspl
nomdemcaspl ;
obldemcaspl ;

!LEXICON perscassg
!nomdemcassg ;
!oblperscassg ;

!LEXICON perscaspl
!nomdemcaspl ;
!oblperscaspl ;




LEXICON nomdemcassg
!The nominative, then pointing to clitics
!This could be conflated, but look out for interr
+Nom:t K ;
LEXICON nomdemcaspl
+Nom:t K ;


!LEXICON oblperscassg
!!The other cases, then pointing to clitics
!+Gen:n K ;
!!+Gen+Use/-Spell:n# NAMAT ;
!+Acc:n K ;
!+Ill:sa K ;
!+Loc:s K ;
!+Com:jnna K ; !dáinna Sg Com


LEXICON obldemcassg
!The other cases, then pointing to clitics
+Gen:n K ;
+Loc+Attr:n K ;
+Ill+Attr:n K ;
!+Gen+Use/-Spell:n# NAMAT ;
+Acc:n K ;
+Ill:sa K ;
+Loc:s K ;
+Com:jnna K ; !dáinna Sg Com

!LEXICON obldatdemcassg - fjerna dat som Pers
!!The other cases, then pointing to clitics
!+Gen:n K ;
!+Loc+Attr:n K ;
!+Ill+Attr:n K ;
!!+Gen+Use/-Spell:n# NAMAT ;
!+Acc:n K ;
!+Com:jnna K ; !dainna Sg Com

!LEXICON oblperscaspl
!+Gen:jd9 K ;
!!+Gen+Use/-Spell:jd9# NAMAT ;
!+Acc:jd9 K ;
!+Ill:jdda K ;
!+Loc:jn K ;   !dain   Pl Loc
!!+Loc:jnna K ; !dainna Pl Loc is deemed out in contemporary language.
!+Com:jguin K ;



LEXICON obldemcaspl
+Gen:jd9 K ;
+Com+Attr:jd9 K ;
+Ill+Attr:jd9 K ;
!+Gen+Use/-Spell:jd9# NAMAT ;
+Acc:jd9 K ;
+Ill:jdda K ;
+Loc:jn K ;   !dain   Pl Loc
!+Loc:jnna K ; !dainna Pl Loc is deemed out in contemporary language.
+Com:jguin K ;
+Com+Attr+Use/NG:jguin K ;

!This case paradigm is exceptional and partial.
LEXICON Dahtanaga-par
+Sg+Nom:%>htanaga # ;
+Sg+Gen:%>mmanaga # ;
+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>mmanaga # ;
+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>mmanaga # ;
!+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>mmanaga# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Acc:%>mmanaga # ;
+Sg+Ill:%>sanaga # ;
+Sg+Loc:%>sttánaga # ;
+Sg+Com:%>jnnanaga # ;
+Pl+Ill:%>jddanaga # ;
+Pl+Loc:%>jnnanaga # ;

LEXICON DAKKAR
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Attr: K ;
!+Attr+Use/-Spell:# NAMAT ;
+Ess:%>in K ;
+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
00:%>i DAKKARI- ;

LEXICON DAKKARI-
+Sg+Ill:j K ;
+Sg+Loc:s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:jn K ;
+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:jnna K ;
+Pl+Gen:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:jd9# NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;

LEXICON MAKKARInterr
+Sg+Nom: K-son ;
+Attr: K-son ;
!+Attr+Use/-Spell:# NAMAT ;
+Ess:%>in K-son ;
+Sg+Gen:%>a K-son ;
+Sg+Acc:%>a K-son ;
+Pl+Nom:%>at K-son ;
00:%>i MAKKARI-Interr ;

LEXICON MAKKARI-Interr
+Sg+Ill:j K-son ;
+Sg+Loc:s K-son ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K-son ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:jn K-son ;
+Pl+Gen:jd9 K-son ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:jd9 K-son ;
!+Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:jd9# NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc:jd9 K-son ;
+Pl+Ill:jdda K-son ;
+Pl+Loc:jn K-son ;
+Pl+Com:jgujn K-son ;

LEXICON MAKKARGEIndef
+Sg+Nom+Foc/Neg-ge:%>ge # ;
+Attr+Foc/Neg-ge:%>ge # ;
+Ess+Foc/Neg-ge:%>inge # ;
+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge:%>age # ;
+Sg+Acc+Foc/Neg-ge:%>age # ;
+Sg+Ill+Foc/Neg-ge:%>ijge # ;
+Sg+Com+Foc/Neg-ge:%>ijnge # ;
+Sg+Loc+Foc/Neg-ge:%>isge # ;


LEXICON DAKKARAS
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Sg+Nom:%>X7 R ;
+Ess:%>an K ;
:a%> DAKKARASSA- ;

LEXICON DAKKARASSA-
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X8 K ;
! +Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:X4# NAMAT ;
! +Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:X8# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X8s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X8n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Com+Attr:X5jd9 K ;
! +Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:X5jd9# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:X5jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:X5jgujn K ;





! Reflexive pronouns
! ------------------



LEXICON IESLEX
+Sg+Nom:ieš K ;
+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:ies K ;
+Gen+PxPl3+Err/Orth:iežasit K ;
+Acc+PxPl3+Err/Orth:iežasit K ;
!+Sg+Nom+Use/-Spell:ieš# NAMAT ;  ! <======= ok
+Du+Nom:ieža K ;
!+Du+Nom+Err/Orth:ieža# NAMAT ; !
+Pl+Nom:ieža K ;
!+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:ieža# NAMAT ; !
+Gen+PxSg3+Attr+South:ald9 # ;   ! !SOUTH
+Gen+PxDu3+Attr+South:ald9 # ;   ! !SOUTH
+Gen+PxPl3+Attr+South:ald9 # ;   ! !SOUTH
+Ess:iehča%>nassij K ;
+Ess+Err/Orth:ieža%>nassij K ;
+Ess+Err/Orth:iehča%>nassan K ;
+Ess+PxPl3+Err/Orth:iehčanasat K ;
 reflobl ;

LEXICON JIESLEX
+Sg+Nom:jieš K ;
!+Sg+Nom+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:jieš# NAMAT ;  ! <======= ok
+Du+Nom:jieža K ;
!+Du+Nom+Err/Orth:jieža# NAMAT ; !
+Pl+Nom:jieža K ;
!+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:jieža# NAMAT ; !
+Ess:jiehča%>nassij K ;
:j refloblalt ;
